Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-243
Reciprocal agreement; terminated; when.

When the requirements for a license in any state or country with which this state has a reciprocal agreement as authorized by section 71-239 are changed by any law or rule of the authorities of such state so that such requirements are no longer substantially as high as those existing in this state, then such agreement shall be deemed terminated and licenses issued in such state or country shall not be recognized as a basis of granting a license in this state until a new agreement has been negotiated.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 6.